Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-3306
Act; minimum standards; effect of
negotiated agreement with landowner; duties under federal law or permits.

The Oil Pipeline
Reclamation Act provides the minimum standards to be met by a pipeline carrier.
The act is not meant to affect the obligations of a pipeline carrier provided
for in a negotiated agreement with a landowner and is not to affect the duties
of a pipeline carrier under applicable federal law or permits.

Laws 2011, LB629, § 6.